Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Issuance, Expiration, and Renewal of Licenses.

Sec. 28.15.010.
License required. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.011.
Drivers must be licensed.

A person may not be denied the privilege to drive a motor vehicle upon a highway in this state, except as prescribed by law.

Every person exercising the person’s privilege to drive, or exercising any degree of physical control of a motor vehicle upon a highway, vehicular way or area, or other public property in this state, is required to have in the possession of the person a valid Alaska driver’s license issued under the provisions of this chapter for the type or class of vehicle driven, unless expressly exempted by law from this requirement.

A person licensed under the provisions of this chapter may exercise in this state the privilege to drive a motor vehicle and is subject to the restrictions prescribed by this chapter. A municipality may not require a person to obtain any other driver’s license to drive or operate a motor vehicle in this state.

Violation of (b) of this section is an infraction.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 42 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 enactment of subsection (d), see sec. 75(a)(22), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (d).

Secs. 28.15.015,
28.15.020.
Medical exams; exemptions.
[Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.021.
Persons exempt from driver licensing.

The following persons are exempt from driver licensing under this chapter:

an employee of the United States government while operating a motor vehicle owned by or leased to the United States government and being operated on official business, unless the employee is required by the United States government or an agency of that government to have a state driver’s license;

a nonresident who is at least 16 years of age and who has a valid driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction; however, an Alaska driver’s license must be obtained by the end of a 90-day period after entry into the state;

a member of the armed forces of the United States or, if the member’s spouse is 18 years of age or older, the spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United States who has a valid driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction when the permanent residence of the member or spouse is maintained in that jurisdiction;

a person when driving an implement of husbandry, as defined by regulation, that is only temporarily driven or moved on a highway;

a person when driving or operating an off-highway vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, or other vehicle not designed for highway use as specified by the department by regulation;

a person who is at least 16 years of age with a valid driver’s license from a jurisdiction other than Alaska while driving a motor-driven cycle; however, an Alaska driver’s license for driving a motor-driven cycle must be obtained by the end of a 90-day period after entering the state;

a person when operating an electric personal motor vehicle;

certain drivers in the United States military service who are operating commercial motor vehicles for military purposes; in this paragraph, “certain drivers in the United States military service”

means

a member of the United States active duty military, including active duty United States Coast Guard;

a member of the United States military reserves;

a member of the Alaska National Guard or the national guard of another state on active duty in this state, including a member on part-time Alaska National Guard training; and

an individual who serves as an Alaska National Guard military technician; in this sub-subparagraph, “Alaska National Guard military technician” means an individual who is not a member of the military, but is required to wear a military uniform;

does not include an individual who serves as a United States Military Reserve technician;

drivers employed by a municipality or established village, as that term is defined in AS

04.21.080

, with a population of 3,000 or less operating snow removal equipment in this state within the boundaries of the municipality or established village if

the employee who is properly licensed in this state and ordinarily operates the equipment is unavailable; or

the municipality or established village determines that an emergency exists that requires additional assistance;

a nonresident who holds a valid commercial driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction when the permanent residence of the commercial driver is maintained in that jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 142 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (7) was enacted as (5); renumbered in 2002.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 5, 2014, rewrote (3), which read, “a member of the armed forces of the United States who has a valid driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction when the permanent residence of the member is maintained in that jurisdiction”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A person who works two weeks in Alaska, leaves for two weeks, then returns and continues this cycle over a period of time so that he has remained in Alaska for a total of 90 days is not required to obtain an Alaska driver’s license.
July 31, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 28.15.030.
Persons not to be licensed. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.031.
Persons not to be licensed.

The department may not issue a driver’s license to a person who is

under the age of 16 years, except that the department may issue a permit under AS

28.15.051

or a restricted license under AS

28.15.121

; or

at least 16 years of age but not yet 18 years of age unless the person meets the requirements of AS

28.15.057

.

The department may not issue an original or duplicate driver’s license to, nor renew or reinstate the driver’s license of, a person

whose license is suspended, revoked, canceled, or withdrawn in this or any other jurisdiction except as otherwise provided in this chapter;

who fails to appear in court for the adjudication of a certain vehicle, driver, or traffic offense when the person’s appearance is required by statute, regulation, or court rule;

who is an habitual user of alcohol or another drug to such a degree that the person is incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;

when the department, based upon medical evidence, has determined that because of the person’s physical or mental disability the person is not able to drive a motor vehicle safely;

who is unable to understand official traffic control devices as displayed in this state or who does not have a fair knowledge of traffic laws and regulations, as demonstrated by an examination;

who has knowingly made a false statement in the person’s application for a license or has committed fraud in connection with the person’s application for, or in obtaining or attempting to obtain, a license, or who has not applied under oath on the form provided for the purpose of obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or permit; or

who is required under AS 28.20 to furnish proof of financial responsibility and who has not done so.

The department may not issue an original or duplicate commercial driver’s license to, nor renew or reinstate the commercial driver’s license of, a person who is disqualified from operating commercial motor vehicles in this or any other jurisdiction or is not domiciled in this state.

In this section, “disqualified” has the meaning given in AS

28.33.190

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1998; am §§ 4, 5 ch 23 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (b)(4)-(7) were formerly (b)(5)-(8).
Renumbered in 2006 to reflect the 1988 repeal of former (b)(4).

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Sec. 28.15.040.
Instruction permits and temporary licenses. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.041.
Classification of drivers’ licenses.

The commissioner shall provide by regulation for the classification of drivers’ licenses. The regulations must specify license classifications that are reasonably necessary for the safe operation of the various types, sizes, and combinations of motor vehicles. The regulations must also establish medical standards, standards of driving conduct and proficiency, and other standards governing the issuance, renewal, or denial of these licenses. The department may examine each applicant to determine the applicant’s qualifications according to the class of license applied for, and upon issuing a driver’s license the department shall indicate on the license the classification for which an applicant for a license has qualified by examination. The regulations and any subsequent modifications under this section become effective only if approved by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority vote of each house of the legislature.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 53 SLA 1990.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 53 SLA 1990.]

The commissioner shall adopt regulations for the issuance of drivers’ licenses that are federally compliant. For drivers’ licenses that are federally compliant, the department

shall copy, scan, or retain only the minimum number of documents required by P.L. 109-13, Division B (REAL ID Act of 2005), or other applicable state or federal law, for issuance of a driver’s license that is federally compliant;

shall destroy, regularly and as close as practicable to 15 years after the date of application unless otherwise required by another applicable state or federal law, any documents retained under (1) of this subsection; and

may not copy, scan, or retain in any form a document that is not required to be retained under (1) of this subsection.

The department shall continue to issue drivers’ licenses that are not federally compliant. Nothing in this section or regulations adopted under this section requires a driver to be issued a driver’s license that is federally compliant. An applicant must clearly request a driver’s license that is federally compliant to obtain one. The state or a municipal government may not require a person to possess or use a driver’s license that is federally compliant unless the person is a state or municipal employee and the duties of the person’s job require the use of a driver’s license that is federally compliant. The state or a municipal government shall otherwise treat a driver’s license that is not federally compliant the same as a driver’s license that is federally compliant. For a driver’s license that is not federally compliant, the department

shall retain an image of the face on the license for not more than 15 years after the date of application; if an applicant does not receive a driver’s license, the department may not retain an image of the applicant’s face;

shall scan and retain only the minimum documents necessary for issuance of the driver’s license; the department shall destroy any documents retained one year after the driver’s license expires.

The department shall provide public information about the differences between drivers’ licenses and drivers’ licenses that are federally compliant. The department shall also provide the information to applicants for new and renewal drivers’ licenses at the time of application. At a minimum, the information must include a description of

each type of driver’s license;

the storage and sharing process for an applicant’s information for a driver’s license and a driver’s license that is federally compliant; and

the official purpose and limitations on the use of each type of driver’s license, including a description of the purposes for which a driver’s license that is federally compliant may be required and a description of alternatives to using a driver’s license that is federally compliant to serve those purposes.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 53 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

For definitions, see 2 AAC 90, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (d) — (f).

Sec. 28.15.046.
Licensing of school bus drivers.

In addition to the requirements of AS

28.15.041(a)

, a person may not drive a school bus transporting school children to or from a public school to enable them to participate in class or a school activity, or a bus transporting school children to or from a public school for classroom studies until the person has applied for and has been issued a license for that purpose under this section. This subsection does not apply to a person or motor vehicle exempted under regulations adopted by the commissioner. In this subsection “classroom studies” means curriculum studies that take place in a public school building.

The department may not issue a license under this section unless the applicant

is at least 21 years of age;

has had a license to operate a motor vehicle at least three years before the date of application;

has successfully completed all required driving, written, and physical examinations;

has submitted the applicant’s fingerprints, the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check, and other information sufficient to complete a background check consisting of a fingerprint check of national criminal records and state criminal records of the state or states in which the applicant has resided for the past 10 years; the department shall submit the fingerprints and fees to the Department of Public Safety for a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

;

has completed a state approved school bus driver training course established under AS

14.07.020(a)(14)

or has for the previous two years been licensed by the state to operate a school bus.

The department may not issue a license under this section to an applicant

who has been convicted of any of the following offenses:

a violation, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a violation, of AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.220

,

11.41.260

—

11.41.320

,

11.41.360

—

11.41.370

,

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

, or

11.41.500

—

11.41.530

;

a felony violation of endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under AS

11.51.100

;

felony indecent viewing or production of a picture under AS

11.61.123

;

distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125

;

possession of child pornography under AS

11.61.127

;

distribution of indecent material to minors under AS

11.61.128

;

felony prostitution under AS

11.66.100(e)

;

sex trafficking in the first, second, or third degree under AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.130

;

a felony involving distribution of a controlled substance under AS 11.71 or imitation controlled substance under AS 11.73;

a felony violation under AS

28.35.030(n)

or

28.35.032(p)

; or

who has been convicted of any of the following offenses and less than two years have elapsed since the applicant’s date of conviction for the offense:

assault in the fourth degree under AS

11.41.230

;

reckless endangerment under AS

11.41.250

;

contributing to the delinquency of a minor under AS

11.51.130

;

misdemeanor prostitution under AS

11.66.100(a)(2)

;

a misdemeanor violation of endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under AS

11.51.100

.

The department may not issue a license under this section if, at the time of application

and under circumstances other than those described in (2) of this subsection, less than two years have elapsed from the date of the applicant’s first conviction of either driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance under AS

28.35.030

or refusal to submit to a chemical test under AS

28.35.032

;

less than 10 years have elapsed from the date of the applicant’s conviction for

refusal to submit to a chemical test under AS

28.35.032

if the offense occurred while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or

an offense described in AS

28.33.140(a)(1)

, (4), (5), or (10);

the applicant has been convicted two or more times of misdemeanor driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance under AS

28.35.030

or misdemeanor refusal to submit to a chemical test under AS 28.35.032, or a combination of those offenses.

For purposes of determining whether an applicant has been convicted of an offense listed under (c) or (d) of this section, a conviction under prior state law or in another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of the offenses listed in (c) or (d) of this section is considered a conviction.

Costs of conducting the background check required under (b)(4) of this section shall be paid by the applicant. Application for renewal may be made by submitting to the department the results of a current physical examination and paying the required fee.

Conviction of an offense described in (c) or (d) of this section is grounds for the immediate cancellation of a license issued under this section.

To qualify for a license, an applicant who has been convicted of an offense described in (c)(2) or (d) of this section shall supply proof that is acceptable to the department of the date of the applicant’s conviction for the offense.

A license issued under this section expires unless renewed within five years after the date of its issuance. A person may renew a license under this section within one year before its expiration upon proper application, payment of the required fee, and the completion of a background check under (b)(4) of this section.

The holder of a school bus driver’s license under this section shall, at the time of renewal, report, on a form provided by the department, a conviction for an offense listed in (c), (d), or (e) of this section.

Notwithstanding (c) or (d) of this section, the department may, under standards set by regulation, issue a license to a person who

may otherwise not be issued a license under (d)(3) of this section if, in the 10-year period immediately preceding the application under this subsection, the person has not been convicted of a violation of driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance under AS

28.35.030

or refusal to submit to a chemical test under AS

28.35.032

;

has been convicted of an offense listed under (c)(2)(A) — (D) of this section if less than two years have elapsed since the date of conviction and the offense was not against a child.

In this section, the date of conviction is the date that sentence is imposed for the offense.

History.

(§ 3 ch 19 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 12 SLA 1990; am § 19 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 17 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 23 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 45 SLA 2014)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, in subparagraph (c)(1)(G), "AS

11.66.100(e)

" was substituted for "AS

11.66.100(c)

" to reflect the 2016 relettering of that subsection.

In 2019, “production of a picture” was substituted for “photography” in (c)(1)(C) to reflect the 2019 amendment to AS

11.61.123

in sec. 42, ch. 4, FSSLA 2019.

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (c)(8), substituted “sex trafficking” for “promoting prostitution”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(4), substituted “resided for the past 10 years” for “resided for the past two years”; rewrote (c) and (d), which read, “(c) The department may not issue a license under this section to an applicant who has been convicted of any of the following offenses within 20 years of the time of application: (1) sexual abuse of a minor in any degree under AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

; (2) sexual assault in any degree under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.425

; (3) incest under AS

11.41.450

; (4) unlawful exploitation of a minor under AS

11.41.455

; (5) contributing to the delinquency of a minor under AS

11.51.130

; (6) a felony involving possession of a controlled or imitation controlled substance under AS 11.71 or AS 11.73; (7) a felony or misdemeanor involving distribution of a controlled or imitation controlled substance under AS 11.71 or AS 11.73; (8) sex trafficking in the first or second degree under AS

11.66.110

or

11.66.120

; (9) indecent exposure in the first or second degree under AS

11.41.458

or

11.41.460

. (d) The department may not issue a license to an applicant who has been convicted of driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance under AS

28.35.030

within two years of the time of application or to an applicant who has two or more convictions for driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance within 10 years of the time of application.”; in (e), deleted “substantially” following “offense having elements”; added (g) — (

l

).

Editor's notes. —

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendment to (c)(8) of this section applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Under Sec. 14(b), ch. 45, SLA 2014, the 2014 changes to (c) — (e) of this section and subsections (g) — (

l

) “do not apply to an offense for which the person was unconditionally discharged before July 1, 2004.”

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1665 — 1669.

Sec. 28.15.050.
Applications. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.051.
Instruction permits, temporary drivers’ licenses, and special drivers’ permits and licenses.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who is at least 14 years of age may apply to the department for a noncommercial instruction permit. The department may, after the applicant has successfully passed all parts of the examination under AS

28.15.081

other than the driving test, issue to the applicant an instruction permit. The permit allows a person, while having the permit in the person’s immediate possession, to drive a specified noncommercial type or class of motor vehicle on a highway or vehicular way or area for a period not to exceed two years. The permittee shall be accompanied by a person at least 21 years of age who has been licensed at least one year to drive the type or class of vehicle being used, who is capable of exercising control over the vehicle and who occupies a seat beside the driver, or who accompanies and immediately supervises the driver when the permittee drives a motorcycle. An instruction permit may be renewed one time. Once a license is issued to drive a specified type or class of motor vehicle, a driver is not eligible to obtain an instructional permit for that specified type or class of motor vehicle unless five years have passed since the expiration of the license.

The department, upon receiving proper application, may issue a restricted instruction permit effective for a school year or for a more restricted period to an applicant who is at least 14 years of age and who is enrolled in a driver education program that includes practice driving and is approved by the department. The restricted instruction permit allows the permittee, when the permittee has the permit in the permittee’s immediate possession, to drive a specified type or class of motor vehicle; however, an approved instructor must occupy a seat beside the permittee or, if the permittee is driving a motorcycle, the permittee must be accompanied by and under the immediate supervision of an approved instructor.

The department may issue a temporary driver’s license to an applicant for a driver’s license permitting the applicant to drive a specified type or class of motor vehicle while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the applicant’s eligibility to receive a driver’s license. The temporary license must be in the applicant’s immediate possession while the applicant is driving a motor vehicle. A temporary driver’s license is invalid when the applicant’s license has been issued or has been refused for good cause.

The department may issue a special driver’s permit to a person who is at least 14 years of age with the consent of the person’s parents, guardians, or spouse who is 18 years of age or older, for the purpose of driving a motor-driven cycle. This permit may be issued upon application and successful completion of all prescribed tests and fees, and is valid for the same period of time as a driver’s license. The permit is not valid in a municipality that by ordinance prohibits the driving of a motor-driven cycle by a person under the age of 16 years; a borough may adopt the ordinance on a nonareawide basis only, unless the power to adopt it on an areawide basis is acquired under AS

29.35.300

—

29.35.330

or former AS 29.33.250 — 29.33.290.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the department may issue a special driver’s license to a person who is under the age of 16 years because of the circumstances of hardship. Special licenses to be issued because of hardship shall be determined on an individual basis by the commissioner.

A person who is at least 18 years of age may apply to the department for a commercial instruction permit. The department may, after the applicant has successfully passed all parts of the examination under AS

28.15.081

other than the driving test, issue to the applicant a commercial instruction permit. The permit allows a person, while having the permit in the person’s immediate possession, to drive a specified commercial type or class of motor vehicle on a highway or vehicular way or area for a period not to exceed 180 days. The permittee shall be accompanied by a person at least 21 years of age who has been licensed at least one year to drive the type or class of vehicle being used, who is capable of exercising control over the wheel, and who occupies a seat beside the driver. A commercial instruction permit may be renewed one time for a period of 180 days. Once a license is issued to drive a specified type or class of motor vehicle, a driver is not eligible to obtain a commercial instructional permit for that specified type or class of motor vehicle unless

five years have passed since the expiration of the previous license; or

the commercial instruction permit is obtained for the purpose of adding an endorsement to a current class of commercial license.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 50 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 10 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 23 SLA 2007; am §§ 9, 10 ch 80 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “a noncommercial” following “apply to the department for”, and made a stylistic change, in the third sentence, substituted “a specified noncommercial type or class” for “a specified type or class”, and in the last sentence, added “unless five years have passed since the expiration of the license” at the end; added (f).

Sec. 28.15.055.
Provisional driver’s license.

Upon application, the department may issue a provisional driver’s license to a person who is at least 16 years of age but not yet 18 years of age if the

person has been licensed under an instruction permit issued under AS

28.15.051

or under the law of another state with substantially similar requirements for at least six months;

person’s parent, legal guardian, or employer provides proof satisfactory to the department that the applicant has at least 40 hours of driving experience, including at least 10 hours of driving in progressively challenging circumstances, such as driving in inclement weather and nighttime driving; and

person has not been convicted of a violation of a traffic law within the six months before the application is filed; in this paragraph, “traffic law” has the meaning given to “traffic laws” in AS

28.15.261

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 93 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 165 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Sec. 28.15.057.
Restrictions on driver’s license issued to a person under 18.

Except as provided under AS

28.15.051

, a person who is at least 16 years of age but not yet 18 years of age may not be issued a driver’s license unless the person has

been licensed under an instruction permit issued under AS

28.15.051

or under the law of another state with substantially similar requirements for at least six months;

held a valid provisional driver’s license issued under AS

28.15.055

for at least six months; and

not been convicted of violating a traffic law during the six months before applying for a driver’s license; in this paragraph, “traffic law” has the meaning given to “traffic laws” in AS

28.15.261

.

A person authorized to drive a motor vehicle under a provisional driver’s license issued under AS

28.15.055

may not

operate a motor vehicle that is carrying any passengers

except a passenger who is a parent, legal guardian, sibling, or a person at least 21 years of age; or

unless at least one of the passengers is a parent, legal guardian, or person at least 21 years of age; or

operate a motor vehicle between the hours of 1:00 a.m. and 5:00 a.m., except when the person is

accompanied by a parent, legal guardian, or a person at least 21 years of age who is licensed to drive the type or class of vehicle being used; or

driving to or from the person’s place of employment or within the scope of the person’s employment and the driving is along the most direct available route.

This section does not apply to restricted licenses issued to persons to operate motor vehicles in areas of the state off the road system when operating motor vehicles in those areas.

A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.

History.

(§ 3 ch 93 SLA 1998; am §§ 2, 3 ch 165 SLA 2004; am § 17 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (a)(3), deleted “, or been convicted of violating AS

04.16.050(c)

,” preceding “during the six months”.

Sec. 28.15.060.
Applications of minors. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.061.
Application for driver’s license or instruction permit; notice of anatomical gift and living will procedure.

Application for an instruction permit or for a driver’s license must be made on a form furnished by the department and must be accompanied by the fee required under AS

28.15.271

.

An application under (a) of this section must

contain the applicant’s full legal name, date and place of birth, sex, and mailing and residence addresses;

state whether the applicant has been previously licensed in the past 10 years as a driver and, if so, when and by what jurisdiction;

state whether any previous driver’s license issued to the applicant has ever been suspended or revoked or whether an application for a driver’s license has ever been refused and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, or refusal;

contain the applicant’s social security number; the requirement of this paragraph only applies to an applicant who has been issued a social security number;

contain other information that the department may reasonably require to determine the applicant’s identity, competency, and eligibility; and

require that the applicant indicate

that the applicant understands the options for drivers’ licenses available at the time of issuance; and

the type of driver’s license that the applicant selects.

When an application is received from a person previously licensed in another jurisdiction, the department may request a copy of the applicant’s driving record from the other jurisdiction. Upon receipt of that record by the department, it becomes a part of the driver’s record in this state with the same effect as if the record originated in this state.

An employee of the department who processes a driver’s license application, other than an application received by mail, shall ask the applicant orally whether the applicant wishes to execute an anatomical gift. The department shall make known to all applicants the procedure for executing an anatomical gift under AS 13.52 (Health Care Decisions Act) by displaying posters in the offices in which applications are taken, by providing a brochure or other written information to each person who applies in person or by mail, and, if requested, by providing oral advice. The department shall inform each applicant in writing that, if the applicant executes a gift under AS 13.52 and if the gift is made with the driver’s license application, the department will transmit the information on the license to a donor registry created under AS

13.50.110

. The department shall also direct the applicant to notify a procurement organization or the department under AS

13.50.140

if the license is destroyed or mutilated or the gift is revoked under AS

13.52.183

. The department shall carry out the requirements of AS

13.50.100

—

13.50.190

.

[Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

At the time of application for a driver’s license or an instruction permit, or renewal of a driver’s license or an instruction permit, the department shall provide the applicant written information explaining the state’s financial responsibility and mandatory motor vehicle insurance laws and potential penalties for failure to comply with those laws.

Upon request, the department shall provide a social security number provided under this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized by law.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 5, 17 ch 70 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 43 SLA 1988; am § 22 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 20 ch 80 SLA 1997; am §§ 51, 52 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2001; am § 13 ch 54 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 68 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 33 ch 100 SLA 2008; am § 10 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 54, SLA 2001 deletes “social security number” from paragraph (b)(1), effective July 1, 2003.
The same change was made by § 1, ch. 40, SLA 2001, effective June 26, 2001.

In 2004, in subsection (d), “AS 13.52” was substituted for “AS 13.50 or includes an anatomical gift in a living will under AS 18.12” and “AS

13.52.170

” was substituted for “AS 13.50.050” in order to reconcile chs. 68 and 83, SLA 2004.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (g) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b)(6), and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendments to this section by § 54(b), ch. 132, SLA 1998, which were to take effect July 1, 2001, were repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sections 14 and 17, ch. 54, SLA 2001, which were to repeal (g) of this section effective July 1, 2003, were repealed by § 3, ch. 37, SLA 2003.

Sec. 28.15.070.
Examination. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.071.
Application of minors.

The application of a person under the age of 18 years for an instruction permit or driver’s license must be signed by the father, mother, guardian, or spouse who is 18 years of age or older, or if there is no parent, guardian, or spouse, then by another responsible adult who is willing to assume the obligation imposed under this section upon a person signing the application. The application must be signed and verified before a person authorized to administer oaths, or be signed in the presence of an authorized representative of the department.

Any negligence or wilful misconduct of a person under the age of 18 years when driving a motor vehicle in this state is imputed to the person who signed the application of the person for a permit or license, and that person is jointly and severally liable for damage caused by the negligence or wilful misconduct of the person under the age of 18 years, except as provided in (c) of this section.

If a minor deposits, or there is deposited on behalf of the minor, proof of financial responsibility for the minor’s driving of a motor vehicle, in the form and amount required in AS 28.20, then the department may accept the application of the minor signed as required under (a) of this section, and, while proof of financial responsibility is maintained, the parent, guardian, spouse, or other responsible adult is not subject to the liability imposed under (b) of this section.

A person who signs the application of a minor for a driver’s license may file with the department a verified written request that the license of the minor be canceled. When the license is canceled, the person who signed the application is relieved from liability under (b) of this section.

This section does not apply to a person under 18 years of age who is legally emancipated under AS

09.55.590

or a similar law in another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 11, 12 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 119 SLA 1990)

Sec. 28.15.080.
Issuance. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]